Utah statutes.
41-1a-519.   Dealer requirements for certificate of title or Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture.

(1)  If a dealer delivers a new off-highway vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor to the purchaser, the dealer shall apply for issuance of a certificate of title or Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture, as appropriate, in the purchaser's name within 45 days of the date of sale.

(2)  A dealer who purchases or takes in trade a used off-highway vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor on which a certificate of title has previously been issued is not required to apply for a certificate of title.



Amended by Chapter 252, 2006 General Session

